trunk/apertium-sv-da/apertium-sv-da.sv.dix
<pardef n="mars__n" c="autoconcord:ut,sgpl"> <!-- Common; ~ / ~månaden / ~månader / ~månaderna; invariant in singular indefinite genitive -->
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>månaden</l>   <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>månader</l>   <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>månaderna</l> <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="april__n" c="autoconcord:ut,sgpl"> <!-- Common; ~ / ~månaden / ~månader / ~månaderna -->
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>månaden</l>   <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>månader</l>   <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>månaderna</l> <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>

</pardef>

<pardef n="histori/a__n" c="autoconcord:ut,sgpl"> <!-- Common; ~a / ~en | (~an) / ~er / ~erna -->
  <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>an</l>        <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>er</l>        <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>erna</l>      <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="kolleg/a__n" c="autoconcord:ut,sgpl"> <!-- Common; ~a / ~an / ~er | (~or) / ~erna | (~orna) -->
  <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e a="PT">       <p><l>an</l>        <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>or</l>        <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>er</l>        <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>orna</l>      <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>erna</l>      <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="st/ad__n" c="autoconcord:ut,sgpl"> <!-- Common; ~ad / ~aden / ~äder / ~äderna -->
  <e>       <p><l>ad</l>        <r>ad<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>aden</l>      <r>ad<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e r="LR" c="style:fam" a="PT">       <p><l>an</l>      <r>ad<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>äder</l>      <r>ad<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>äderna</l>    <r>ad<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="m/an__n" c="autoconcord:ut,sgpl"> <!-- Common; ~an / ~annen / ~än / ~ännen -->
  <e>       <p><l>an</l>        <r>an<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>annen</l>     <r>an<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>än</l>        <r>an<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ännen</l>     <r>an<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="l/and__n" c="autoconcord:nt,sgpl"> <!-- Neuter; ~and / ~andet / ~änder / ~änderna -->
  <e>       <p><l>and</l>       <r>and<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>andet</l>     <r>and<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>änder</l>     <r>and<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>änderna</l>   <r>and<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="h/and__n" c="autoconcord:ut,sgpl"> <!-- Common; ~and / ~anden / ~änder / ~änderna -->
  <e>       <p><l>and</l>       <r>and<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>anden</l>     <r>and<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>änder</l>     <r>and<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>änderna</l>   <r>and<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="n/att__n" c="autoconcord:ut,sgpl"> <!-- Common; ~att / ~atten / ~ätter / ~ätterna -->
  <e>       <p><l>att</l>       <r>att<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>atten</l>     <r>att<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ätter</l>     <r>att<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ätterna</l>   <r>att<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="bokst/av__n" c="autoconcord:ut,sgpl"> <!-- Common; ~av / ~aven / ~äver / ~äverna -->
  <e>       <p><l>av</l>        <r>av<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>aven</l>      <r>av<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>äver</l>      <r>av<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>äverna</l>    <r>av<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="abborr/e__n" c="autoconcord:ut,sgpl"> <!-- Common; ~e / ~en / ~ar / ~arna -->
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ar</l>        <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>arna</l>      <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="apotekar/e__n" c="autoconcord:ut,sp"> <!-- Common; ~e / ~en / ~e / ~na; invariant singular/plural indefinite -->
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sp"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>na</l>        <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="kis/el__n" c="autoconcord:nt,sgpl"> <!-- Neuter; ~el / ~let / # / #; uncountable -->
  <e>       <p><l>el</l>        <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>let</l>       <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="sek/el__n" c="autoconcord:nt,sp"> <!-- Neuter; ~el / ~let / ~el / ~len; invariant singular/plural indefinite -->
  <e>       <p><l>el</l>        <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sp"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>let</l>       <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>len</l>       <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="talman">          <i>talm</i><par n="m/an__n"/></e>
<e lm="gärningsman">     <i>gärningsm</i><par n="m/an__n"/></e>
<e lm="deltagare">       <i>deltagar</i><par n="apotekar/e__n"/></e>
<e lm="skidåkare">       <i>skidåkar</i><par n="apotekar/e__n"/></e>
<e lm="augusti">         <i>augusti</i><par n="april__n"/></e>
<e lm="bekant">          <i>bekant</i><par n="april__n"/></e>
<e lm="bokstav">         <i>bokst</i><par n="bokst/av__n"/></e>
<e lm="kisel">           <i>kis</i><par n="kis/el__n"/></e>
<e lm="svavel">          <i>svav</i><par n="kis/el__n"/></e>
<e lm="nickel">          <i>nick</i><par n="kis/el__n"/></e>
<e lm="hand">            <i>h</i><par n="h/and__n"/></e>
<e lm="and">             <i></i><par n="h/and__n"/></e>
<e lm="strand">          <i>str</i><par n="h/and__n"/></e>
<e lm="tand">            <i>t</i><par n="h/and__n"/></e>
<e lm="hemland">         <i>heml</i><par n="l/and__n"/></e>
<e lm="innehavare">      <i>innehavar</i><par n="apotekar/e__n"/></e>
<e lm="januari">         <i>januari</i><par n="april__n"/></e>
<e lm="juli">            <i>juli</i><par n="april__n"/></e>
<e lm="kapitel">         <i>kapit</i><par n="sek/el__n"/></e>
<e lm="krage">           <i>krag</i><par n="abborr/e__n"/></e>
<e lm="maj">             <i>maj</i><par n="april__n"/></e>
<e lm="mars">            <i>mars</i><par n="mars__n"/></e>
<e lm="natt">            <i>n</i><par n="n/att__n"/></e>
<e lm="oktober">         <i>oktober</i><par n="april__n"/></e>
<e lm="sekel">           <i>sek</i><par n="sek/el__n"/></e>
<e lm="bostad">          <i>bost</i><par n="st/ad__n"/></e>
<e lm="stad">            <i>st</i><par n="st/ad__n"/></e>
<e lm="strupe">          <i>strup</i><par n="abborr/e__n"/></e>
<e lm="historia">        <i>histori</i><par n="histori/a__n"/></e>
<e lm="huvudstad">       <i>huvudst</i><par n="st/ad__n"/></e>
<e lm="storstad">        <i>storst</i><par n="st/ad__n"/></e>
<e lm="brand">           <i>br</i><par n="h/and__n"/></e>
<e lm="regnbåge">        <i>regnbåg</i><par n="abborr/e__n"/></e>
<e lm="anslutningsland" a="is"><i>anslutningsl</i><par n="l/and__n"/></e>
<e lm="medlemsland" a="is"><i>medlemsl</i><par n="l/and__n"/></e>
<e lm="eftertanke" a="is"><i>eftertank</i><par n="apotekar/e__n"/></e>
<e lm="tjänsteman" a="is"><i>tjänstem</i><par n="m/an__n"/></e>
<e lm="eu-land" a="is">  <i>eu-l</i><par n="l/and__n"/></e>
<e lm="grannland" a="is"><i>grannl</i><par n="l/and__n"/></e>
<e lm="skogsbr" a="is">  <i>skogsbr</i><par n="h/and__n"/></e>
<e lm="anhängare" a="is"><i>anhängar</i><par n="apotekar/e__n"/></e>
<e lm="talesman" a="is"> <i>talesm</i><par n="m/an__n"/></e>
<e lm="milstolpe" a="PT"><i>milstolp</i><par n="abborr/e__n"/></e>
<e lm="utland" a="is">   <i>utl</i><par n="l/and__n"/></e>
<e lm="engelsman" a="is"><i>engelsm</i><par n="m/an__n"/></e>
<e lm="midnatt" a="is">  <i>midn</i><par n="n/att__n"/></e>
<e lm="näve" a="is">     <i>näv</i><par n="abborr/e__n"/></e>
<e lm="mögel" a="is">    <i>mög</i><par n="sek/el__n"/></e>
<e lm="medel" a="is">    <i>med</i><par n="sek/el__n"/></e>
<e lm="fönsterbräda" a="SALDO">    <i>fönsterbräd</i><par n="kolleg/a__n"/></e>
<e lm="kobra" a="SALDO">           <i>kobr</i><par n="kolleg/a__n"/></e>
<e lm="kypare" a="SALDO">          <i>kypar</i><par n="apotekar/e__n"/></e>
<e lm="långpanna" a="SALDO">       <i>långpann</i><par n="kolleg/a__n"/></e>
<e lm="platta" a="SALDO">          <i>platt</i><par n="kolleg/a__n"/></e>
<e lm="stekpanna" a="SALDO">       <i>stekpann</i><par n="kolleg/a__n"/></e>
<e lm="upphovsman" a="SALDO">      <i>upphovsm</i><par n="m/an__n"/></e>
<e lm="verkstad" a="SALDO">        <i>verkst</i><par n="st/ad__n"/></e>
<e lm="vira" a="SALDO">            <i>vir</i><par n="kolleg/a__n"/></e>
<e lm="köpstad" a="PT">              <i>köpstad</i><par n="st/ad__n"/></e>
<e lm="loge" c="domain:lantliv" a="PT">              <i>log</i><par n="abborr/e__n"/></e>
<e lm="schackel" c="domain:sjöochhav" a="PT">              <i>schack</i><par n="sek/el__n"/></e>
